Utah statutes.
72-5-113.   Acquisition of entire lot, block, or tract -- Sale or exchange
of remainder.
If a part of an entire lot, block, tract of land, or interest or improvement
in real property is to be acquired by the department and the remainder is to
be left in a shape or condition of little value to its owner or to give rise
to claims or litigation concerning damages, the department may acquire the
whole of the property and may sell the remainder or may exchange it for other
property needed for highway purposes.
